Maryland, session 2026, HB1241.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
3–802.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1241*

HOUSE BILL 1241
(2) “Bereavement leave” means leave an employee is allowed to use on the
death of [a member of the employee’s immediate family THE EMPLOYEE’S FAMILY
MEMBER] AN INDIVIDUAL WITH WHOM THE EMPLOYEE HAD A QUALIFIED
RELATIONSHIP.
(3) “Child” means:
(i) for the purposes of leave provided under subsection (d)(1)(i) of
this section, an adopted, biological, or foster child, a stepchild, or a legal ward who is:
1. under the age of 18 years; or
2. at least 18 years old and incapable of self–care due to a
mental or physical disability; or
(ii) for the purposes of bereavement leave under subsection (d)(1)(ii)
of this section, an adopted, biological, or foster child, a stepchild, or a legal ward.
(4) (i) “Employer” means a person that is engaged in a business,
industry, profession, trade, or other enterprise in the State.
(ii) “Employer” includes a person who acts directly or indirectly in
the interest of another employer with an employee.
(5) [“Immediate family” means a child, spouse, or parent.] “FAMILY
MEMBER” MEANS:
(I) A CHILD;
(II) A PARENT;
(III) A SPOUSE OR DOMESTIC PARTNER;
(IV) A SPOUSE’S OR DOMESTIC PARTNER’S PARENT;
(V) A CHILD’S SPOUSE OR DOMESTIC PARTNER;
(VI) A SIBLING;
(VII) A SIBLING’S SPOUSE OR DOMESTIC PARTNER;
(VIII) A GRANDPARENT;
(IX) A GRANDPARENT’S SPOUSE OR DOMESTIC PARTNER;
(X) A GRANDCHILD;

HOUSE BILL 1241 3
(XI) A GRANDCHILD’S SPOUSE OR DOMESTIC PARTNER; AND
(XII) AN INDIVIDUAL RELATED BY BLOOD OR AFFINITY WHOSE
CLOSE ASSOCIATION WITH AN EMPLOYEE IS THE EQUIVALENT OF A FAMILY
RELATIONSHIP.
(6)] (i) “Leave with pay” means paid time away from work that is earned
and available to an employee:
1. based on hours worked; or
2. as an annual grant of a fixed number of hours or days of
leave for performance of service.
(ii) “Leave with pay” includes sick leave, vacation time, paid time off,
and compensatory time.
(iii) “Leave with pay” does not include:
1. a benefit provided under an employee welfare benefit plan
subject to the federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974;
2. an insurance benefit, including benefits from an
employer’s self–insured plan;
3. workers’ compensation;
4. unemployment compensation;
5. a disability benefit; or
6. a similar benefit.
[(7)] (6) “Parent” means an adoptive, biological, or foster parent, a
stepparent, a legal guardian, or a person standing in loco parentis.
(7) “QUALIFIED RELATIONSHIP” INCLUDES A RELATIONSHIP WITH:
(I) AN IMMEDIATE FAMILY MEMBER;
(II) A GRANDPARENT;
(III) A SIBLING;
(IV) A DOMESTIC PARTNER;

HOUSE BILL 1241
(V) A STEP–RELATION;
(VI) AN ADOPTIVE RELATION;
(VII) A FOSTER RELATION; AND
(VIII) A DE FACTO RELATION.
(b) (1) This section applies to an employee who is primarily employed in the
State.
(2) This section applies to an employer that:
(i) provides leave with pay under the terms of a collective
bargaining agreement or an employment policy; and
(ii) employs 15 or more employees for each working day in each of 20
or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding calendar year.
(c) The purpose of subsection (d)(1)(i) is to allow an employee of an employer to
use leave with pay to care for an A immediate family member who is ill under the same
conditions and policy rules that would apply if the employee took leave for the employee’s
own illness.
(d) (1) An employee of an employer may use leave with pay, OR LEAVE
WITHOUT PAY IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE EMPLOYER’S UNPAID LEAVE POLICY, for:
(i) the illness of the employee’s immediate family MEMBER; or
(ii) bereavement leave.
(2) An agreement between an employer and employee to waive the
provisions of this section is void.
(e) (1) An employee of an employer:
(i) may only use leave with pay under this section that has been
earned; and
(ii) who earns more than one type of leave with pay may elect the
type and amount of leave with pay to be used under this section.
(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, an employee of
an employer who uses leave under this section shall comply with the terms of a collective
bargaining agreement or employment policy.

HOUSE BILL 1241 5
(3) If the terms of a collective bargaining agreement with an employer or
an employment policy of an employer provide a leave with pay benefit that is equal to or
greater than the benefit provided under this section, the collective bargaining agreement
or employment policy prevails.
(f) An employer may not discharge, demote, suspend, discipline, or otherwise
discriminate against an employee or threaten to take any of these actions against an
employee because the employee:
(1) has requested leave authorized under this section;
(2) has taken leave authorized under this section;
(3) has opposed a practice made unlawful by this section; or
(4) has made a charge, testified, assisted, or participated in an
investigation, proceeding, or hearing under this section.
(g) This section does not:
(1) extend the maximum period of leave an employee has under the federal
Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993; or
(2) limit the period of leave to which an employee is entitled under the
federal Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993.
(h) (1) Whenever the Commissioner determines that this section has been
violated, the Commissioner shall:
(i) try to resolve any issue involved in the violation informally by
mediation; or
(ii) ask the Attorney General to bring an action on behalf of the
applicant or employee.
(2) The Attorney General may bring an action under this subsection in the
county where the violation allegedly occurred for injunctive relief, damages, or other relief.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.